Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2439
Immunosuppressant drug donation.

Any person or entity, including, but not limited to, an immunosuppressant drug manufacturer or transplant center, may donate immunosuppressant drugs to a participant or return previously prescribed immunosuppressant drugs to the transplant center where they were originally prescribed.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 45.